Final source/morphy/foma/interjection.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
InterjectionsStem;

LEXICON InterjectionsStem

ආ	Interjections;
අනේ	Interjections;
කොහොමද	Interjections;
ඕ	Interjections;
කවුද	Interjections;
මොකක්ද	Interjections;
අම්මේ	Interjections;
දෝ	Interjections;
එහෙමයි	Interjections;
අපොයි	Interjections;
චී	Interjections;
අයියෝ	Interjections;
ෂා	Interjections;
අම්මෝ	Interjections;
ආයි	Interjections;
අහා	Interjections;
උසි	Interjections;
ෂික්	Interjections;
ඌයි	Interjections;
එහෙයි	Interjections;
හුරේ	Interjections;
ඔහෝ	Interjections;
ආනේ	Interjections;
අප්පච්චියේ	Interjections;
අඩෝ	Interjections;
උහ්	Interjections;
අඳෝමැයි	Interjections;
ඕහ්	Interjections;
අඳෝ	Interjections;
චිහ්	Interjections;
දෝහෝ	Interjections;
ඌහ්	Interjections;
ෂිහ්	Interjections;
සීසී	Interjections;
හෙලෙයියා	Interjections;




LEXICON Interjections

+N+RT: #;
